Hawaii statutes.
[§269E-3] General duties and powers of the
commission. The general duties and powers of the commission shall be to:

(1) Establish and administer a one call center that
provides advance warning to excavators in this State of the location of
subsurface installations in the area of an excavation for the purpose of
protecting those installations from damage;

(2) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules pursuant to chapter
91 as it may deem necessary to effectuate this chapter. The rules adopted
shall have the force and effect of law and may include but are not limited to
rules that:

(A) Forbid acts or practices deemed by the
commission to be detrimental to the accomplishment of the purposes of this
chapter; and

(B) Require operators and excavators to make
reports to the commission containing information that will enable the
commission to improve the accomplishment of this chapter;

(3) Enforce this chapter and any rules adopted
pursuant thereto;

(4) Issue binding interpretations or declaratory
rulings, and conduct contested case proceedings pursuant to chapter 91; and

(5) Subpoena witnesses and documents, administer
oaths, and receive affidavits and oral testimony, including telephonic and
electronic communications. [L 2004, c 141, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next